Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.451

Enforcement of registered determination.

(1) A court of this state may grant any relief normally available under the law of this state to enforce a registered child custody determination made by a court of another state.

(2) A court of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, except in accordance with Article 2, a registered child custody determination of a court of another state.

[ 2001 c 65 s 306.]